apertium-sh-mk/apertium-sh-mk.sh.dix.xml
<?xml version="1.0" encoding="UTF-8"?>
<dictionary>
  <!-- The Serbo-Croatian alphabet, along with the letters x, y, w which are found in loan words -->
  <alphabet>ABCČĆDDžĐEFGHIJKLLjMNNjOPRSŠTUVZŽabcčćddžđefghijklljmnnjoprsštuvzžwWxXyY</alphabet>

  <sdefs>
    <sdef n="n"       c="Noun"/>
    <sdef n="m"       c="Masculine"/>
    <sdef n="f"       c="Feminine"/>
    <sdef n="nt"      c="Neuter"/>
    <sdef n="mf"      c="Masculine-Feminine"/>

    <sdef n="mi"      c="Masculine (inanimate)"/>
    <sdef n="ma"      c="Masculine (animate)"/>

    <sdef n="sg"      c="Singular"/>
    <sdef n="pl"      c="Plural"/>
    <sdef n="prn"     c="Pronoun"/>
    <sdef n="pr"      c="Preposition"/>

    <sdef n="cnjcoo"  c="Co-ordinating conjunction"/>
    <sdef n="cnjsub"  c="Subordinating conjunction"/>
    <sdef n="cnjadv"  c="Adverbial conjunction"/>

    <sdef n="vbser"   c="The verb 'to be'"/>
    <sdef n="vblex"   c="Lexical verb"/>	
    <sdef n="vaux"    c="Auxilliary verb"/>	
    <sdef n="vbhaver" c="The verb 'to have'"/>
    <sdef n="vbmod"   c="Modal verb"/>
    <sdef n="pri"     c="Present indicative"/>
    <sdef n="pii"     c="Imperfect indicative"/>
    <sdef n="past"    c="Past tense"/>
    <sdef n="pres"    c="Present tense"/>
    <sdef n="inf"     c="Infinitive"/>
    <sdef n="aor"     c="Aorist"/>
    <sdef n="fti"     c="Future indicative"/>
    <sdef n="imp"     c="Imperative"/>

    <sdef n="pref"    c="Prefix"/>
    <sdef n="part"    c="Particle"/>

    <sdef n="exp"     c="Expectative"/>
    <sdef n="sbj"     c="Subjunctive"/>
    <sdef n="opt"     c="Optative"/>

    <sdef n="aff"     c="Affirmative"/>
    <sdef n="int"     c="Interrogative"/>
    <sdef n="neg"     c="Negative"/>

    <sdef n="p1"      c="First person"/>
    <sdef n="p2"      c="Second person"/>
    <sdef n="p3"      c="Third person"/>
    <sdef n="impers"  c="Impersonal"/>

    <sdef n="gen"     c="Genitive"/>
    <sdef n="nom"     c="Nominative"/>
    <sdef n="dat"     c="Dative"/>
    <sdef n="loc"     c="Locative"/>
    <sdef n="acc"     c="Accusative"/>
    <sdef n="ins"     c="Instrumental"/>
    <sdef n="voc"     c="Vocative"/>

    <sdef n="ind"     c="Indefinite"/>    
    <sdef n="def"     c="Definite"/>
    <sdef n="prx"     c="Proximate"/>
    <sdef n="dst"     c="Distal"/>

    <sdef n="sp"      c="Singular / Plural"/>
    <sdef n="ref"     c="Reflexive"/>
    <sdef n="num"     c="Numeral / Number"/>
    <sdef n="ij"      c="Interjection"/>
 
    <sdef n="tn"      c="Tonico"/>
    <sdef n="adj"     c="Adjective"/>
    <sdef n="sint"    c="Synthetic adjective"/>
    <sdef n="pve"     c="Positive"/>
    <sdef n="comp"    c="Comparative"/>
    <sdef n="sup"     c="Superlative"/>
    <sdef n="attr"    c="Attributive"/>
    <sdef n="pred"    c="Predicative"/>

    <sdef n="enc"     c="Enclitic"/>
    <sdef n="pro"     c="Proclitic"/>

    <sdef n="detnt"   c="Neuter determiner"/>
    <sdef n="predet"  c="Pre determiner"/>
    <sdef n="atn"/>
    <sdef n="qnt"     c="Quantifier"/>
    <sdef n="ord"     c="Ordinal"/>
    <sdef n="obj"     c="Object"/>
    <sdef n="subj"    c="Subject"/>
    <sdef n="acr"     c="Acronym"/>
    <sdef n="ant"     c="Antroponym"/>
    <sdef n="top"     c="Toponym"/>

    <sdef n="al"      c="Other / Otros"/>
    <sdef n="np"      c="Proper noun"/>
    <sdef n="adv"     c="Adverb"/>
    <sdef n="preadv"  c="Pre-adverb"/>
    <sdef n="rel"     c="Relative"/>
    <sdef n="nn"      c="Noun noun"/>
    <sdef n="an"      c="Adjective noun"/>
    <sdef n="aa"      c="Adjective adjective"/>
    <sdef n="itg"     c="Interrogative"/>
    <sdef n="det"     c="Determiner"/>
    <sdef n="dem"     c="Demonstrative"/>
    <sdef n="ger"     c="Gerund"/>
    <sdef n="pp"      c="Past participle"/>
    <sdef n="lp"      c="L-participle"/>
    <sdef n="cni"     c="Conditional"/>
    <sdef n="prs"     c="Present subjunctive"/>
    <sdef n="pis"     c="Pretério imperfecto de subjunctivo"/>
    <sdef n="pos"     c="Possessive"/>


    <sdef n="sent"    c="End of sentence"/>
    <sdef n="cm"      c="Comma"/>
    <sdef n="lpar"    c="Left parenthesis"/>
    <sdef n="rpar"    c="Right parenthesis"/>
    <sdef n="lquest"  c="Left question-mark"/>
    <sdef n="web"/>
    <sdef n="subs"/>
    <sdef n="pprs"/>    
    <sdef n="guio"    c="Hyphen"/> 
    <sdef n="vbdo"/>
    <sdef n="unc"/>
    <sdef n="sep"/>
    <sdef n="pron"/>
    <sdef n="apos"    c="Apostrophe"/>

  </sdefs>

  <!-- punctuation -->
  <pardefs>
    <pardef n="guionet">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>-</l>
          <r>-<s n="guio"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="coma">
      <e>
        <p>
         <l>,</l>
         <r>,<s n="cm"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="cometa">
      <e>
        <p>
         <l>'</l>
         <r>'<s n="apos"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="numeros">
      <e>
        <re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="num"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="separa">
      <e>
        <re>[.\?;:!]</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="sent"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="paresq">
      <e>
        <re>[\(\[]</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="lpar"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="pardret">
      <e>
        <re>[\)\]]</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="rpar"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <!-- ORTHOGRAPHIC PARADIGMS -->

    <!-- Vowel change ~ Ekavian - Ijekavian -->

    <pardef n="e_je__yat">
      <group alt="sh">
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>e</l>
            <r>e</r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e r="LR">
          <p>
            <l>je</l>
            <r>e</r>
          </p>
        </e>
      </group>
      <group alt="sh_BS">
        <e r="LR">
          <p>
            <l>e</l>
            <r>e</r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>je</l>
            <r>e</r>
          </p>
        </e>
      </group>
      <group alt="sh_HR">
        <e r="LR">
          <p>
            <l>e</l>
            <r>e</r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>je</l>
            <r>e</r>
          </p>
        </e>
      </group>
      <group alt="sh_SR">
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>e</l>
            <r>e</r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e r="LR">
          <p>
            <l>je</l>
            <r>e</r>
          </p>
        </e>
      </group>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="e_ije__yat">
      <group alt="sh">
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>e</l>
            <r>e</r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e r="LR">
          <p>
            <l>ije</l>
            <r>e</r>
          </p>
        </e>
      </group>
      <group alt="sh_BS">
        <e r="LR">
          <p>
            <l>e</l>
            <r>e</r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>ije</l>
            <r>e</r>
          </p>
        </e>
      </group>
      <group alt="sh_HR">
        <e r="LR">
          <p>
            <l>e</l>
            <r>e</r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>ije</l>
            <r>e</r>
          </p>
        </e>
      </group>
      <group alt="sh_SR">
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>e</l>
            <r>e</r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e r="LR">
          <p>
            <l>ije</l>
            <r>e</r>
          </p>
        </e>
      </group>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="mesto"><i>m</i><par n="e_je__yat"/><i>sto</i><par n="za__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="umesto"><i>um</i><par n="e_je__yat"/><i>sto</i><par n="za__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="posle"><i>posl</i><par n="e_ije__yat"/><par n="za__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="pre"><i>pr</i><par n="e_ije__yat"/><par n="za__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="gde"><i>gd</i><par n="e_je__yat"/><par n="ne__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="još uvek"><i>još<b/>uv</i><par n="e_ije__yat"/><i>k</i><par n="ne__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="primer"><i>prim</i><par n="e_je__yat"/><i>r</i><par n="požar__n"/></e>
    <e lm="veće"><i>v</i><par n="e_ije__yat"/><i>ć</i><par n="src/e__n"/></e>
    <e lm="vreme"><i>vr</i><par n="e_ije__yat"/><i>m</i><par n="vrem/e__n"/></e>
    <e lm="rečnik"><i>r</i><par n="e_je__yat"/><i>čni</i><par n="rečni/k__n"/></e>
    <e lm="lječnik"><i>l</i><par n="e_je__yat"/><i>čni</i><par n="radni/k__n"/></e>
    <e lm="prevod"><i>pr</i><par n="e_ije__yat"/><i>vod</i><par n="prozor__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pridev"><i>prid</i><par n="e_je__yat"/><i>v</i><par n="prozor__n"/></e>
    <e lm="reč"><i>r</i><par n="e_ije__yat"/><i>č</i><par n="reč__n"/></e>
    <e lm="zvezda"><i>zv</i><par n="e_ije__yat"/><i>zd</i><par n="žen/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="mesto"><i>m</i><par n="e_je__yat"/><i>st</i><par n="mest/o__n"/></e>
    <e lm="odvetnik"><i>odv</i><par n="e_je__yat"/><i>tni</i><par n="unu/k__n"/></e>
    <e lm="medved"><i>medv</i><par n="e_je__yat"/><i>d</i><par n="inženjer__n"/></e>
    <e lm="promena"><i>prom</i><par n="e_je__yat"/><i>n</i><par n="žen/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pena"><i>p</i><par n="e_je__yat"/><i>n</i><par n="žen/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="lečnica"><i>l</i><par n="e_ije__yat"/><i>čnic</i><par n="žen/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="sreda"><i>sr</i><par n="e_ije__yat"/><i>d</i><par n="žen/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="veštica"><i>v</i><par n="e_je__yat"/><i>štic</i><par n="žen/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="cena"><i>c</i><par n="e_ije__yat"/><i>n</i><par n="žen/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="devojčica"><i>d</i><par n="e_je__yat"/><i>vojčic</i><par n="žen/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="nedelja"><i>ned</i><par n="e_je__yat"/><i>lj</i><par n="žen/a__n"/></e>
    <e>
      <par n="separa"/>
    </e>
    <e>
      <par n="numeros"/>
    </e>
    <e>
      <par n="coma"/>
    </e>
    <e>
      <par n="cometa"/>
    </e>
    <e>
      <par n="paresq"/>
    </e>
    <e>
      <par n="pardret"/>
    </e>
    <e>
      <par n="guionet"/>
    </e>
